Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.106

Certificate or permit suspension—Noncompliance with support order—Reissuance.

Any certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be suspended by the authority authorized to grant the certificate or permit if the department of social and health services certifies that the person is not in compliance with a support order or a *residential or visitation order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. If the person continues to meet other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the certificate or permit shall be automatic after the person provides the authority a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

[ 1997 c 58 s 842.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1997 c 58 s 886 requiring a court to order certification of noncompliance with residential provisions of a court-ordered parenting plan was vetoed. Provisions ordering the department of social and health services to certify a responsible parent based on a court order to certify for noncompliance with residential provisions of a parenting plan were vetoed. See RCW 74.20A.320.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.